Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6701
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6701 to 77-6706 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 111;

Laws 2022, LB873, § 4.